Maryland, session 2026, HB1084.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–103.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b), (e), (f), [and] (g), AND (H) of this section,
each public school under the jurisdiction of a county board:
(1) (i) Shall be open for pupil attendance for at least 180 actual school
days and a minimum of 1,080 school hours during a 10–month period in each school year;
or
(ii) If normal school attendance is prevented because of conditions
described in subsection (b) of this section, shall be open for at least 1,080 hours during a
10–month period;
(2) Shall be open for pupil attendance a minimum of 3 hours during each
school day; and
(3) May not be open on Saturdays, Sundays, or holidays in order to meet
the 180–day or 1,080–hour requirement of this subsection.
(b) (1) If a county board submits a written application to the State Board that
describes a demonstrated effort by the county board to comply with subsection (a) of this
section, the State Board may permit:
(i) The following adjustments:
1. An increase in the length of the school year; or
2. A decrease in the length of the school year;
(ii) Exceptions from the requirement that the school year be
completed within a 10–month period;
(iii) Adjustments in the length of the school day; and

HOUSE BILL 1084 3
(iv) Schools to be open on holidays.
(2) These adjustments may be granted only if normal school attendance is
prevented because of:
(i) Natural disaster;
(ii) Civil disaster; or
(iii) Severe weather conditions.
(3) Education funding from State or local sources may not be reduced if
there are less than 180 school days in any year because of an approved application under
paragraph (1)(i)2 of this subsection.
(4) In case of emergency, the State Board may open schools on holidays.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, the State Board shall
divide the school year into the terms it considers appropriate.
(e) (1) The county boards of Allegany, Anne Arundel, Calvert, Howard,
Montgomery, and Prince George’s counties, and the Board of School Commissioners of
Baltimore City, may elect to operate one or more schools within the county or Baltimore
City on a year–round basis, provided that the 180–day and the minimum hour
requirements under this section are met.
(2) Nothing in this section precludes a county board from conducting a
year–round pilot study or program that is funded by the county board.
(f) (1) In this subsection, “minimal hours of attendance” means the minimum
hours of attendance for the school year required under COMAR 13A.03.02.12, in effect on
July 1, 2025.
(2) Subject to the requirements of this subsection, the Anne Arundel
County Board of Education may elect to operate all of the schools within the county using
a scheduling model that eliminates early dismissal days to allow for less than 180 school
days if the minimal hours of attendance are met.
(3) If the Anne Arundel County Board of Education elects to use a
scheduling model that eliminates early dismissal days in accordance with this subsection,
the county board must use the scheduling model for all schools in the county.
(4) If the Anne Arundel County Board of Education uses a scheduling
model that results in a school in the county being open for less than 180 days, the county
board shall offer school employees who receive pay at an hourly rate an opportunity to make
up the lost wages through other duties before the beginning of the next school year.

HOUSE BILL 1084
(G) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “MINIMAL HOURS OF ATTENDANCE” MEANS
THE MINIMUM HOURS OF ATTENDANCE FOR THE SCHOOL YEAR REQUIRED UNDER
COMAR 13A.03.02.12, IN EFFECT ON JANUARY 1, 2026.
(2) THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION MAY ELECT
TO REQUIRE PUBLIC SCHOOLS WITHIN THE COUNTY TO BE OPEN FOR PUPIL
ATTENDANCE ONLY FOR AT LEAST:
(1) THE THE MINIMUM NUMBER OF ACTUAL SCHOOL DAYS REQUIRED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1)(I) OF THIS SECTION; OR
(2) THE MINIMUM NUMBER OF SCHOOL HOURS REQUIRED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(1)(I) OF THIS SECTION THE MINIMAL HOURS OF ATTENDANCE IF:
(I) THE SCHOOL CALENDAR WAS ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION;
(II) NORMAL SCHOOL ATTENDANCE AT PUBLIC SCHOOLS IN THE
COUNTY WAS PREVENTED DUE TO A CONDITION DESCRIBED UNDER SUBSECTION
(B)(2) OF THIS SECTION, NECESSITATING ADDITIONAL TIME TO MEET THE NUMBER
OF REQUIRED SCHOOL DAYS OR MINIMAL HOURS OF ATTENDANCE:
1. AFTER THE SCHEDULED END OF THE SCHOOL YEAR;
OR
2. DURING A DAY THAT SCHOOLS ARE SCHEDULED FOR
CLOSURE;
(III) THE LOCAL SCHOOL SYSTEM HAS USED AT LEAST 2 SCHOOL
DAYS INCORPORATED INTO ITS CALENDAR FOR SCHOOL CLOSURES DUE TO SEVERE
WEATHER;
(IV) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
MONTGOMERY COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION HAS APPLIED FOR AN ADJUSTMENT
TO THE SCHOOL YEAR UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION; AND
(V) PUBLIC SCHOOLS REMAIN OPEN FOR AT LEAST 175 ACTUAL
SCHOOL DAYS DURING THE SCHOOL YEAR.
(3) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO REQUIRE THE
MONTGOMERY COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION TO RECEIVE AN APPROVAL OR
DENIAL OF A REQUEST TO ADJUST THE SCHOOL YEAR BEFORE ELECTING TO
REQUIRE ONLY THE MINIMUM NUMBER OF ACTUAL SCHOOL DAYS OR THE MINIMAL
HOURS OF ATTENDANCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.

HOUSE BILL 1084 5
(4) IF A PUBLIC SCHOOL IN THE COUNTY IS OPEN FOR FEWER THAN
180 ACTUAL SCHOOL DAYS OR THE MINIMAL HOURS OF ATTENDANCE IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION, THE MONTGOMERY COUNTY BOARD OF
EDUCATION SHALL PROVIDE SCHOOL EMPLOYEES WHO RECEIVE PAY AT AN HOURLY
RATE AN OPPORTUNITY TO MAKE UP THE LOST WAGES THROUGH OTHER DUTIES
BEFORE THE BEGINNING OF THE NEXT SCHOOL YEAR.
[(g)] (H) Publicly funded half–day prekindergarten programs are not subject to
the requirements of subsection (a) of this section.
[(h)] (I) Notwithstanding any other law and subject only to this section, each
county board annually shall set the start and end dates of the school year for schools in the
county.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(a) On or before June 30, 2026, and on or before June 30, 2027, the Montgomery
County Board of Education shall report to the State Board of Education and, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, to the General Assembly on the operation
of schools during the preceding school year that were open fewer than 180 actual school
days or the minimal hours of attendance in accordance with § 7–103(g) of the Education
Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act.
(b) The reports required under this section shall include a summary for
elementary, middle, and high schools open fewer than 180 actual school days or the
minimal hours of attendance on:
(1) the days the schools were open; and
(2) the number of hours per day that the schools were open with students
in attendance.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2026 is an emergency measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the
public health or safety, has been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of
all the members elected to each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take
effect from the date it is enacted. It shall remain effective through June 30, 2027, and, at
the end of June 30, 2027, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.